Hawaii statutes.
PART VII.
VIOLATIONS, PENALTIES, PROSECUTION, COMPACTS,

CONSTRUCTION

§159-51 Interstate and federal compacts.
(a) The board is hereby designated as the state agency which is responsible
for cooperating with the Secretary of Agriculture under section 301 of the
Federal Meat Inspection Act, and the board is directed to cooperate with the
Secretary of Agriculture in administering the meat inspection program of this
State under this chapter to assure that its requirements remain at least equal
to those imposed under the Federal Meat Inspection Act and in administering the
program of this State under this chapter in a manner that will effectuate the
purposes of this chapter, the Federal Meat Inspection Act, and rules and
regulations adopted thereunder.

(b) In cooperative efforts, the board may
accept from the Secretary of Agriculture advisory assistance in administering
the state program, technical and laboratory assistance and training, including
necessary curricular and instructional materials and equipment, and financial
and other aid for administration of the program.

(c) The board may recommend to the Secretary
of Agriculture, the officials or employees of this State as the board shall
designate for appointment to the advisory committees provided for in section
301 of the Federal Meat Inspection Act; and the board shall serve as the
representative of the governor for consultation with the Secretary of
Agriculture under paragraph (c) of section 301 of the Federal Meat Inspection
Act unless the governor shall select another representative. [L 1969, c 214, pt
of §1; am L 1990, c 139, §13; am L 1991, c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next